Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5313.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 Sec. 16211. (1) The department shall create and maintain a permanent historical record for each licensee and registrant with respect to information and data transmitted pursuant to law. (2) The individual historical record shall must include a written allegation against the licensee or registrant that is substantiated after investigation. (3) The individual historical record may include other items concerning a licensee's or registrant's record of practice that the appropriate board determines will facilitate proper and periodic review, but only those items as designated by rule. (4) The Subject to section 16211a, the department shall promptly review the entire file of a licensee or registrant, including all prior matters with respect to which no action was taken at the time, with respect to whom there is received 1 or more of the following: (a) A notice of revocation, suspension, or limitation of staff privileges or a change in employment status due to disciplinary action by a licensed health facility. (b) A written allegation of a violation of this article, article 7, or a rule promulgated under this article or article 7 that is substantiated after investigation. (c) A notice of disciplinary action by a health professional society. (d) An adverse malpractice settlement, award, or judgment. (e) Written notice of 1 or more of the following: (i) A felony conviction. (ii) A misdemeanor conviction punishable by imprisonment for a 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 maximum term of 2 years. (iii) A misdemeanor conviction, if the misdemeanor involves the illegal delivery, possession, or use of alcohol or a controlled substance. (f) Notice that a licensee or registrant is ineligible to participate as a provider in a federally funded health insurance or health benefits program based upon the licensee's or registrant's failure to meet the program's standards of professional practice. A certified copy of the action or final order making the licensee or registrant ineligible is sufficient notice for purposes of this subdivision. (g) A report or notice under section 16222. (h) Notice of a disciplinary action by a licensure, registration, disciplinary, or specialty certification board in another state. (5) The department shall retain written allegations that are unsubstantiated for 5 years, after which the department shall remove the allegations from the file, if no further allegations against the licensee or registrant have been received by the department within the 5-year period. (6) Except as provided in section 16231(6), 16231(7), a licensee, registrant, or applicant may review his or her the individual historical record of the licensee, registrant, or applicant. Sec. 16211a. (1) A licensee, a registrant, or an applicant for licensure or registration may submit an application to the department to set aside a disciplinary record of the licensee, registrant, or applicant that involves a final order arising from a finding of the existence of 1 or more grounds for disciplinary 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 subcommittee action under section 16221. The application must be in a form and manner required by the department. The department shall set aside a disciplinary record of a licensee, registrant, or applicant if the licensee, registrant, or applicant demonstrates all of the following to the department: (a) The licensee, registrant, or applicant successfully completed the terms of the final order. (b) Not less than 7 years have passed since the licensee, registrant, or applicant completed the terms of the final order. (c) The final order did not result in the licensee, registrant, or applicant surrendering the license or registration. (d) The final order did not impose any of the following sanctions: (i) Limitation. (ii) Denial. (iii) Suspension. (iv) Revocation. (v) Permanent revocation. (e) The licensee, registrant, or applicant establishes that the licensee, registrant, or applicant has not been the subject of another final order imposing sanctions under this article since the date of the final order for the disciplinary record that the licensee, registrant, or applicant is seeking to set aside. (f) It is in the public interest to set aside the disciplinary record. (2) If the department sets aside a disciplinary record under this section for a licensee, registrant, or applicant, the department shall do both of the following: (a) Remove the disciplinary record from the department's 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 public licensing and registration website described in section 16216. (b) Withdraw or void any report made by the department to the National Practitioner Data Bank regarding the disciplinary record. (3) A licensee, registrant, or applicant who has a disciplinary record set aside under this section may represent that no disciplinary record exists regarding the subject matter of the disciplinary record that was set aside. (4) The department may charge a reasonable fee for the administrative processing of setting aside a disciplinary record under this section that does not exceed the costs incurred by the department in setting aside the disciplinary record. (5) A disciplinary record that is set aside under this section is not subject to disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (6) The department may promulgate rules to implement this section. Sec. 16216. (1) The chair of each board or task force shall appoint 1 or more disciplinary subcommittees for that board or task force. A disciplinary subcommittee for a board or task force shall must consist of 2 public members and 3 professional members from the board or task force. (2) A final decision of a disciplinary subcommittee finding a violation of this article, article 7, or article 8 requires a majority vote of the members appointed and serving on the disciplinary subcommittee. (3) A final decision of a disciplinary subcommittee imposing a sanction under this article, article 7, or article 8 or a final decision of a disciplinary subcommittee other than a final decision 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 described in subsection (2) requires a majority vote of the members appointed and serving on the disciplinary subcommittee with an affirmative vote by at least 1 public member. (4) The chair of a board or task force shall appoint a public member of the disciplinary subcommittee of that board or task force as the chairperson of that disciplinary subcommittee. The chair of a board or task force shall not serve as a member of the disciplinary subcommittee of that board or task force. (5) The department may review a final decision of a disciplinary subcommittee within 30 days after the date of the disciplinary subcommittee's decision. If the department determines that the action taken by a disciplinary subcommittee does not protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public, the department, with the approval of the board chair, may set aside the decision of the disciplinary subcommittee and issue a different final action. The final action of the department serves as the final action on the matter and is subject to judicial review in the same manner as the final decision of the disciplinary subcommittee. (6) Beginning January 1, 2015, Except as otherwise provided in section 16211a, the department shall include on its public licensing and registration website each final decision that imposes disciplinary action against a licensee, including the reason for and description of that disciplinary action. Sec. 16221. Subject to section 16221b, the department shall investigate any allegation that 1 or more of the grounds for disciplinary subcommittee action under this section exist, and may investigate activities related to the practice of a health profession by a licensee, a registrant, or an applicant for licensure or registration. The department may hold hearings, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 administer oaths, and order the taking of relevant testimony. After its investigation, the department shall provide a copy of the administrative complaint to the appropriate disciplinary subcommittee. The disciplinary subcommittee shall proceed under section 16226 if it finds that 1 or more of the following grounds exist: (a) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this section, a violation of general duty, consisting of negligence or failure to exercise due care, including negligent delegation to or supervision of employees or other individuals, whether or not injury results, or any conduct, practice, or condition that impairs, or may impair, the ability to safely and skillfully engage in the practice of the health profession. (b) Personal disqualifications, consisting of 1 or more of the following: (i) Incompetence. (ii) Subject to sections 16165 to 16170a, substance use disorder as that term is defined in section 100d of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1100d. (iii) Mental or physical inability reasonably related to and adversely affecting the licensee's or registrant's ability to practice in a safe and competent manner. (iv) Declaration of mental incompetence by a court of competent jurisdiction. (v) Conviction of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for a maximum term of 2 years; conviction of a misdemeanor involving the illegal delivery, possession, or use of a controlled substance; or conviction of any felony other than a felony listed or described in another subparagraph of this subdivision. A certified copy of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the court record is conclusive evidence of the conviction. (vi) Lack of good moral character. (vii) Conviction of a criminal offense under section 520e or 520g of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.520e and 750.520g. A certified copy of the court record is conclusive evidence of the conviction. (viii) Conviction of a violation of section 492a of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.492a. A certified copy of the court record is conclusive evidence of the conviction. (ix) Conviction of a misdemeanor or felony involving fraud in obtaining or attempting to obtain fees related to the practice of a health profession. A certified copy of the court record is conclusive evidence of the conviction. (x) Final adverse administrative action by a licensure, registration, disciplinary, or certification board involving the holder of, or an applicant for, a license or registration regulated by another state or a territory of the United States, by the United States military, by the federal government, or by another country. A certified copy of the record of the board is conclusive evidence of the final action. (xi) Conviction of a misdemeanor that is reasonably related to or that adversely affects the licensee's or registrant's ability to practice in a safe and competent manner. A certified copy of the court record is conclusive evidence of the conviction. (xii) Conviction of a violation of section 430 of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.430. A certified copy of the court record is conclusive evidence of the conviction. (xiii) Conviction of a criminal offense under section 83, 84, 316, 317, 321, 520b, 520c, 520d, or 520f of the Michigan penal 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.83, 750.84, 750.316, 750.317, 750.321, 750.520b, 750.520c, 750.520d, and 750.520f. A certified copy of the court record is conclusive evidence of the conviction. (xiv) Conviction of a violation of section 136 or 136a of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.136 and 750.136a. A certified copy of the court record is conclusive evidence of the conviction. (xv) Conviction of a violation of section 90 of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.90, or a violation of a state or federal crime that is substantially similar to the violation described in this subparagraph. A certified copy of the court record is conclusive evidence of the conviction. (c) Prohibited acts, consisting of 1 or more of the following: (i) Fraud or deceit in obtaining or renewing a license or registration. (ii) Permitting a license or registration to be used by an unauthorized person. (iii) Practice outside the scope of a license. (iv) Obtaining, possessing, or attempting to obtain or possess a controlled substance or a drug as that term is defined in section 7105 without lawful authority; or selling, prescribing, giving away, or administering drugs for other than lawful diagnostic or therapeutic purposes. (d) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this section, unethical business practices, consisting of 1 or more of the following: (i) False or misleading advertising. (ii) Dividing fees for referral of patients or accepting kickbacks on medical or surgical services, appliances, or 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 medications purchased by or in on behalf of patients. (iii) Fraud or deceit in obtaining or attempting to obtain third party third-party reimbursement. (e) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this section, unprofessional conduct, consisting of 1 or more of the following: (i) Misrepresentation to a consumer or patient or in obtaining or attempting to obtain third party third-party reimbursement in the course of professional practice. (ii) Betrayal of a professional confidence. (iii) Promotion for personal gain of an unnecessary drug, device, treatment, procedure, or service. (iv) Either of the following: (A) A requirement by a licensee other than a physician or a registrant that an individual purchase or secure a drug, device, treatment, procedure, or service from another person, place, facility, or business in which the licensee or registrant has a financial interest. (B) A referral by a physician for a designated health service that violates 42 USC 1395nn or a regulation promulgated under that section. For purposes of this subdivision, 42 USC 1395nn and the regulations promulgated under that section as they exist on June 3, 2002 are incorporated by reference. A disciplinary subcommittee shall apply 42 USC 1395nn and the regulations promulgated under that section regardless of the source of payment for the designated health service referred and rendered. If 42 USC 1395nn or a regulation promulgated under that section is revised after June 3, 2002, the department shall officially take notice of the revision. Within 30 days after taking notice of the revision, the department shall decide whether or not the revision pertains to referral by 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 physicians for designated health services and continues to protect the public from inappropriate referrals by physicians. If the department decides that the revision does both of those things, the department may promulgate rules to incorporate the revision by reference. If the department does promulgate rules to incorporate the revision by reference, the department shall not make any changes to the revision. As used in this sub-subparagraph, "designated health service" means that term as defined in 42 USC 1395nn and the regulations promulgated under that section and "physician" means that term as defined in sections 17001 and 17501. (v) For a physician who makes referrals under 42 USC 1395nn or a regulation promulgated under that section, refusing to accept a reasonable proportion of patients eligible for Medicaid and refusing to accept payment from Medicaid or Medicare as payment in full for a treatment, procedure, or service for which the physician refers the individual and in which the physician has a financial interest. A physician who owns all or part of a facility in which the physician provides surgical services is not subject to this subparagraph if a referred surgical procedure the physician performs in the facility is not reimbursed at a minimum of the appropriate Medicaid or Medicare outpatient fee schedule, including the combined technical and professional components. (vi) Any conduct by a licensee or registrant with a patient while the licensee or registrant is acting within the health profession for which the licensee or registrant is licensed or registered, including conduct initiated by a patient or to which the patient consents, that is sexual or may reasonably be interpreted as sexual, including, but not limited to, sexual intercourse, kissing in a sexual manner, or touching of a body part 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 for any purpose other than appropriate examination, treatment, or comfort. (vii) Offering to provide practice-related services, such as drugs, in exchange for sexual favors. (viii) A violation of section 16655(4) by a dental therapist. (f) Failure to notify under section 16222(3) or (4). (g) Failure to report a change of name or mailing address as required in section 16192. (h) A violation, or aiding or abetting in a violation, of this article or of a rule promulgated under this article. (i) Failure to comply with a subpoena issued pursuant to this part, failure to respond to a complaint issued under this article, article 7, or article 8, failure to appear at a compliance conference or an administrative hearing, or failure to report under section 16222(1) or 16223. (j) Failure to pay an installment of an assessment levied under the insurance code of 1956, 1956 PA 218, MCL 500.100 to 500.8302, within 60 days after notice by the appropriate board. (k) A violation of section 17013 or 17513. (l) Failure to meet 1 or more of the requirements for licensure or registration under section 16174. (m) A violation of section 17015, 17015a, or 17515. (n) Failure to comply with section 9206(3). (o) A violation of section 5654 or 5655. (p) A violation of section 16274. (q) A violation of section 17020 or 17520. (r) A violation of the medical records access act, 2004 PA 47, MCL 333.26261 to 333.26271. (s) A violation of section 17764(2). 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (t) Failure to comply with the terms of a practice agreement described in section 17047(2)(a) or (b), 17547(2)(a) or (b), or 18047(2)(a) or (b). (u) A violation of section 7303a(2). (v) A violation of section 7303a(4) or (5). (w) A violation of section 7303b. (x) A violation of section 17754a. (y) Beginning January 1, 2021, a A violation of section 24507 or 24509. (z) A failure to complete a continuing education requirement of this article or of a rule promulgated under this article. Sec. 16226. (1) After finding the existence of 1 or more of the grounds for disciplinary subcommittee action listed in section 16221, a disciplinary subcommittee shall impose 1 or more of the following sanctions for each violation: Violations of Section 16221 Sanctions Subdivision (a), (b)(i), Probation, limitation, denial, (b)(ii), (b)(iii), (b)(iv), suspension, revocation, (b)(v), (b)(vi), (b)(vii), permanent revocation, (b)(ix), (b)(x), (b)(xi), restitution, or fine. or (b)(xii) Subdivision (b)(viii) Revocation, permanent revocation, or denial. Subdivision (b)(xiii) Permanent revocation for a violation described in subsection (5); otherwise, probation, limitation, denial, suspension, revocation, restitution, or fine. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Subdivision (b)(xiv) or Permanent revocation. (b)(xv) Subdivision (c)(i) Denial, revocation, suspension, probation, limitation, or fine. Subdivision (c)(ii) Denial, suspension, revocation, restitution, or fine. Subdivision (c)(iii) Probation, denial, suspension, revocation, restitution, or fine. Subdivision (c)(iv) Fine, probation, denial, or (d)(iii) suspension, revocation, permanent revocation, or restitution. Subdivision (d)(i) Reprimand, fine, probation, or (d)(ii) denial, or restitution. Subdivision (e)(i), Reprimand, fine, probation, (e)(iii), (e)(iv), (e)(v), limitation, suspension, (h), or (r) revocation, permanent revocation, denial, or restitution. Subdivision (e)(ii) Reprimand, probation, suspension, or (i) revocation, permanent revocation, restitution, denial, or fine. Subdivision (e)(vi), Probation, suspension, revocation, (e)(vii), or (e)(viii) limitation, denial, restitution, or fine. Subdivision (f) Reprimand, denial, limitation, probation, or fine. Subdivision (g) Reprimand or fine. Subdivision (j) Suspension or fine. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Subdivision (k), (o), Reprimand, probation, suspension, or (q) revocation, permanent revocation, or fine. Subdivision (l) Reprimand, denial, or limitation. Subdivision (m) or (n) Denial, revocation, restitution, probation, suspension, limitation, reprimand, or fine. Subdivision (p) Revocation. Subdivision (s) Revocation, permanent revocation, fine, or restitution. Subdivision (t) Denial, revocation, probation, suspension, limitation, reprimand, or fine. Subdivision (u) or (w) Probation, limitation, denial, fine, suspension, revocation, or permanent revocation. Subdivision (v) Denial, fine, reprimand, probation, limitation, suspension, revocation, or permanent revocation. Subdivision (x) Subject to subsection (7), fine. Subdivision (y) Fine. Subdivision (z) Subject to subsection (8), fine. (2) Determination of sanctions for violations under this section must be made by a disciplinary subcommittee. If, during judicial review, the court of appeals determines that a final decision or order of a disciplinary subcommittee prejudices 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 substantial rights of the petitioner for 1 or more of the grounds listed in section 106 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, MCL 24.306, and holds that the final decision or order is unlawful and is to be set aside, the court shall state on the record the reasons for the holding and may remand the case to the disciplinary subcommittee for further consideration. (3) A disciplinary subcommittee may impose a fine in an amount that does not exceed $250,000.00 for a violation of section 16221(a) or (b). A disciplinary subcommittee shall impose a fine of at least $25,000.00 if the violation of section 16221(a) or (b) results in the death of 1 or more patients. (4) A disciplinary subcommittee may require a licensee or registrant or an applicant for licensure or registration who has violated this article, article 7, or article 8 or a rule promulgated under this article, article 7, or article 8 to satisfactorily complete an educational program, a training program, or a treatment program, a mental, physical, or professional competence examination, or a combination of those programs and examinations. (5) A disciplinary subcommittee shall impose the sanction of permanent revocation for a violation of section 16221(b)(xiii) if the violation occurred while the licensee or registrant was acting within the health profession for which the licensee or registrant was licensed or registered. (6) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) and this subsection, a disciplinary subcommittee shall not impose the sanction of permanent revocation under this section without a finding that the licensee or registrant engaged in a pattern of intentional acts of fraud or deceit resulting in personal financial 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 gain to the licensee or registrant and harm to the health of patients under the licensee's or registrant's care. This subsection does not apply if a disciplinary subcommittee finds that a licensee or registrant has violated section 16221(b)(xiv) or (b)(xv). (7) A disciplinary subcommittee shall impose a fine of not more than $250.00 for each violation of section 16221(x). (8) A disciplinary subcommittee shall impose a fine of not more than the following for a violation of section 16221(z): (a) If the licensee or registrant failed to complete 25 hours or less of continuing education, $250.00. (b) If the licensee or registrant failed to compete more than 25 hours of continuing education, $500.00. Sec. 16231. (1) A person or governmental entity that believes that a violation of this article, article 7, or article 8 or a rule promulgated under this article, article 7, or article 8 exists may submit an allegation of that fact to the department in writing. (2) Subject to subsection (3) and section 16221b, if the department determines after reviewing an application or an allegation or a licensee's or registrant's file under section 16211(4) that there is a reasonable basis to believe that a violation of this article, article 7, or article 8 or a rule promulgated under this article, article 7, or article 8 exists, 1 of the following applies: (a) Unless subdivision (b) applies, subject to subsection (10), with the authorization of a panel of at least 3 board members that includes the chair and at least 2 other members of the appropriate board or task force designated by the chair, the department shall investigate the alleged violation. Subject to subsection (10), if the panel fails to grant or deny authorization 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 within 7 days after the board or task force receives a request for authorization, the department shall investigate. If the department believes that immediate jeopardy exists, the director or his or her designee shall authorize an investigation and notify the board chair of that investigation within 2 business days. (b) If it reviews an allegation in writing under subsection (1) that concerns a licensee or registrant whose record created under section 16211 includes 1 substantiated allegation, or 2 or more written investigated allegations, from 2 or more different individuals or entities, received in the preceding 4 years, the department shall investigate the alleged violation. Authorization by a panel described in subdivision (a) is not required for an investigation by the department under this subdivision. (3) If a person or governmental entity submits a written allegation under subsection (1) more than 4 years after the date of the incident or activity that is the basis of the alleged violation, the department may investigate the alleged violation in the manner described in subsection (2)(a) or (b), as applicable, but is not required to conduct an investigation under subsection (2)(a) or (b). (4) If it receives information reported under section 16243(2) that indicates 3 or more malpractice settlements, awards, or judgments against a licensee in a period of 5 consecutive years or 1 or more malpractice settlements, awards, or judgments against a licensee totaling more than $200,000.00 in a period of 5 consecutive years, whether or not a judgment or award is stayed pending appeal, the department shall investigate. (5) At any time during an investigation or following the issuance of a complaint, the department may schedule a compliance 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 conference under section 92 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, MCL 24.292. The compliance conference may include the applicant, licensee, registrant, or individual, the applicant's, licensee's, registrant's, or individual's attorney, 1 member of the department's staff, and any other individuals approved by the department. One member of the appropriate board or task force who is not a member of the disciplinary subcommittee with jurisdiction over the matter may attend the conference and provide any assistance that is needed. At the compliance conference, the department shall attempt to reach agreement. If an agreement is reached, the department shall submit a written statement outlining the terms of the agreement, or a stipulation and final order, if applicable, or a request for dismissal to the appropriate disciplinary subcommittee for approval. If the agreement or stipulation and final order or request for dismissal is rejected by the disciplinary subcommittee, or if no agreement is reached, the department shall schedule a hearing before an administrative law judge. A party shall not make a transcript of the compliance conference. All records and documents of a compliance conference held before a complaint is issued are subject to section 16238. (6) Within 90 days after an investigation is initiated under subsection (2), (3), or (4), the department shall do 1 or more of the following: (a) Issue a formal complaint. (b) Conduct a compliance conference under subsection (5). (c) Issue a summary suspension. (d) Issue a cease and desist order. (e) Dismiss the allegation. (f) Place Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (g), 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 place in the complaint file not more than 1 written extension of not more than 30 days to take action under this subsection. (g) Subject to section 16231b, place in the complaint file not more than 1 written extension of not more than 90 days to take action under this subsection. (7) Unless the person submitting an allegation under subsection (1) otherwise agrees in writing, the department shall keep the identity of a person that submitted the allegation confidential until disciplinary proceedings under this part are initiated against the subject of the allegation and the person that made the allegation is required to testify in the proceedings. (8) The department shall serve a complaint under section 16192. The department shall include in the complaint a notice that the applicant, licensee, registrant, or individual who is the subject of the complaint has 30 days from the date of receipt to respond in writing to the complaint. (9) The department shall treat the failure of an applicant, licensee, registrant, or individual to respond to a complaint within the 30-day period set forth in subsection (8) as an admission of the allegations contained in the complaint. The department shall notify the appropriate disciplinary subcommittee of the individual's failure to respond and shall forward a copy of the complaint to that disciplinary subcommittee. The disciplinary subcommittee may then impose an appropriate sanction under this article, article 7, or article 8. (10) All of the following apply for purposes of subsection (2)(a): (a) If the chair of the board or task force has a conflict of interest, he or she the chair shall appoint another member of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 board or task force as his or her the chair's designee and shall not participate in the panel's decision to grant or deny authorization to the department to investigate an individual. (b) A member of the board or task force shall not participate in the panel's decision to grant or deny authorization to the department to investigate an individual if that member has a conflict of interest. If the chair of the board or task force is notified that a member of the panel has a conflict of interest, the chair shall remove him or her the member from the panel and appoint another member of the board or task force to serve on the panel. (c) A member of the board or task force who participates in or is requested to participate in the panel's decision to grant or deny authorization to the department to investigate an individual shall disclose to the department, to the chair of the board or task force, and to the other member of the panel a potential conflict of interest before those participants make that decision. (11) As used in subsection (10), "conflict of interest" means any of the following: (a) Has a personal or financial interest in the outcome of the investigation of or the imposition of disciplinary sanctions on the licensee, registrant, or applicant for licensure or registration. (b) Had a past or has a present business or professional relationship with the individual that the department is investigating or requesting authorization to investigate. (c) Has given expert testimony in a medical malpractice action against or on behalf of the individual that the department is seeking authorization to investigate. (d) Any other interest or relationship designated as a conflict of interest in a rule promulgated or order issued under 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 this act. Sec. 16231b. (1) If, after initiating an investigation, the department has a reasonable basis to believe that a licensee or registrant has failed to complete a continuing education requirement prescribed in this article or in a rule promulgated under this article, the department shall issue a letter to the licensee or registrant. The letter must notify the licensee or registrant that the licensee or registrant may be in violation of this article and provide the licensee or registrant with a description of the continuing education requirement that the department has a reasonable basis to believe the licensee or registrant failed to complete. (2) If, not later than 60 days after the letter described in subsection (1) is issued, the licensee or registrant provides written proof to the department demonstrating that the licensee or registrant has completed the continuing education requirement identified in the letter, the department shall dismiss the allegation under section 16231 regardless of whether the licensee or registrant timely completed the continuing education requirement. If the licensee or registrant fails to provide the written proof described in this subsection, the department shall take action under section 16231(6). (3) The department shall not credit a licensee's or registrant's completion of continuing education under subsection (2) toward any renewal cycle other than the renewal cycle that is the subject of the letter described in subsection (1). (4) The department shall not treat an act or failure to act of a licensee or registrant under this section as an admission of the allegation described in subsection (1). 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (5) A letter issued under this section is not considered discipline. Sec. 16238. (1) Except as otherwise provided in section 13(1)(u) (i) and (ii) 13(1)(t)(i) and (ii) of the freedom of information act, Act No. 442 of the Public Acts of 1976, being section 15.243 of the Michigan Compiled Laws, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.243, the information including, but not limited to, patient names, obtained in an investigation or a compliance conference before a complaint is issued, is confidential and shall must not be disclosed except to the extent necessary for the proper functioning of a hearings examiner, a disciplinary subcommittee, or the department. (2) A compliance conference conducted under this part before a complaint is issued shall be is closed to the public. Sec. 17033. (1) Notwithstanding the requirements of part 161, the board may require a licensee physician seeking renewal of a the physician's license to furnish the board with satisfactory evidence that during the 3 years immediately preceding application for renewal the licensee physician has attended continuing education courses or programs approved by the board totaling not less than 150 hours 75 hours in subjects related to the practice of medicine including, but not limited to, medical ethics and designed to further educate licensees. (2) As required under section 16204, the board shall promulgate rules requiring each applicant for license renewal to complete as part of the continuing education requirement of subsection (1) an appropriate number of hours or courses in pain and symptom management. (3) By January 1, 2027, and every 5 years thereafter, the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 board shall review each subject related to the practice of medicine that the board considers necessary to complete as part of the continuing education requirements of subsection (1) to determine whether the subject is still necessary to further educate licensees. The board shall not require a licensee to complete a course or program on a subject that is not required on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection unless 1 or more of the following are met: (a) The course or program is necessary and justified by a public health crisis or emergency declared in accordance with the laws of this state. (b) The course or program is relevant across all specialty areas of medical practice. (c) The course or program addresses an urgent or trending issue that the board determines materially affects the health, safety, and welfare of the public. Sec. 17533. (1) Notwithstanding the requirements of part 161, the board may require a licensee physician seeking renewal of a the physician's license to furnish the board with satisfactory evidence that during the 3 years immediately preceding an application for renewal the licensee physician has attended continuing education courses or programs approved by the board and totaling not less than 150 hours 75 hours in subjects related to the practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery and designed to further educate licensees. (2) As required under section 16204, the board shall promulgate rules requiring each applicant for license renewal to complete as part of the continuing education requirement of subsection (1) an appropriate number of hours or courses in pain 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 and symptom management. (3) By January 1, 2027, and every 5 years thereafter, the board shall review each subject related to the practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery that the board considers necessary to complete as part of the continuing education requirements of subsection (1) to determine whether the subject is still necessary to further educate licensees. The board shall not require a licensee to complete a course or program on a subject that is not required on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection unless 1 or more of the following is met: (a) The course or program is necessary and justified by a public health crisis or emergency declared in accordance with the laws of this state. (b) The course or program is relevant across all specialty areas of medical practice. (c) The course or program addresses an urgent or trending issue that the board determines materially affects the health, safety, and welfare of the public.